Wisconsin, session 2025, SB991.
do enact as follows:SB991,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB991,26Section 2. 20.437 (1) (ev) of the statutes is created to read:SB991,2,9720.437 (1) (ev) Tribal training and technical assistance. The amounts in the 8schedule for contracts under s. 49.137 (4) or grants under s. 49.257 (3) for the 9provision of training and technical assistance for tribal child care providers.SB991,310Section 3. 49.137 (4) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB991,2,161149.137 (4) Training and technical assistance contracts. (intro.) From 12the appropriation under s. 20.437 (1) (ev) and the allocation under s. 49.155 (1g), 13the department may contract with one or more agencies for the provision of training 14and technical assistance to improve the quality of child care provided in this state. 15The training and technical assistance activities contracted for under this 16subsection may include any of the following activities:SB991,417Section 4. 49.257 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB991,2,211849.257 (3) (intro.) From the appropriation under s. 20.437 (1) (ev) and the 19allocation under s. 49.175 (1) (qm), the department may award grants to any of the 20following to improve overall child care quality in the geographic area identified 21under sub. (2):SB991,2,2222